Washington statutes.
RCW 7.80.010

Jurisdiction of courts.

(1) All violations of state law, local law, ordinance, regulation, or resolution designated as civil infractions may be heard and determined by a district court, except as otherwise provided in this section.

(2) Any municipal court has the authority to hear and determine pursuant to this chapter civil infractions that are established by municipal ordinance or by local law or resolution of a transit agency authorized to issue civil infractions, and that are committed within the jurisdiction of the municipality.

(3) Any city or town with a municipal court under chapter 3.50 RCW may contract with the county to have civil infractions that are established by city or town ordinance and that are committed within the city or town adjudicated by a district court.

(4) District court commissioners have the authority to hear and determine civil infractions pursuant to this chapter.

(5) Nothing in this chapter prevents any city, town, or county from hearing and determining civil infractions pursuant to its own system established by ordinance.

[ 2009 c 279 s 2; 1987 c 456 s 9.]